Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1494
Candidates for elective office; statement of financial interest; filing; time.

(1) An individual who files to appear on the ballot for election to an elective office specified in section 49-1493 shall file a statement of financial interests for the preceding calendar year with the commission as provided in this section.

(2) Candidates for the elective offices specified in section 49-1493 who qualify other than by filing shall file a statement for the preceding calendar year with the commission within five days after becoming a candidate or being appointed to that elective office.

(3) If the candidate for an elective office specified in section 49-1493 files to appear on the ballot for election during the calendar year in which the election is held, the candidate shall file a statement of financial interests for the preceding calendar year with the commission on or before March 1 of the year in which the election is held or, if the filing deadline for the elective office is after March 1 of the year in which the election is held, the candidate shall file such statement on or before the filing deadline for the elective office.

(4) A candidate for an elective office specified in section 49-1493 who fails to file a statement of financial interests as required in subsection (1) or (2) of this section within five days after the deadline in subsection (3) of this section and section 49-1493 shall not appear on the ballot.

(5) A statement of financial interests shall be preserved for a period of not less than five years by the commission.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 94;

Laws 1983, LB 479, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 36;

Laws 2016, LB400, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB451, § 15;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 54.